Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.047

Administrator or staff—Health and dental examination and care—Consent.

(1) The administrator of the juvenile court or authorized staff may consent as provided in this section to the provision of health and dental examinations and care, and necessary treatment for medical and dental conditions requiring prompt attention, for juveniles lawfully detained at or sentenced to a detention facility. The treatment may include treatment provided at medical or dental facilities outside the juvenile detention facility and treatment provided within the juvenile detention facility for the period of time the youth is in the custody of the facility. Juveniles shall not be transported for treatment outside the facility if treatment services are available within the facility.

(2) The examination, care, and treatment may be provided without parental consent when prompt attention is required if the administrator of the juvenile court or authorized staff have been unable to secure permission for treatment from the parent or parents, guardian, or other person having custody of the child after reasonable attempts to do so before the provision of the medical and dental services.

(3) Treatment shall not be authorized for juveniles whose parent or parents, guardian, or other person having custody of the child informs the administrator of the juvenile court of objections to the treatment before the treatment is provided except where *RCW 69.54.060 applies.

[ 1983 c 267 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 69.54.060 was repealed by 1989 c 270 s 35.

Employment of dental hygienist without supervision of dentist authorized: RCW 18.29.056.